inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_glossing.lexc
LEXICON VAIO_TAG
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Dub+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+Dub+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+Prt+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Neg+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Prt+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@+VAIO+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VAIO+2+Pl+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@%>%>naawaa #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VAIO+2+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VAIO+Neg+2+Pl+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@%>%>sii%>%>naawaa #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@+VAIO+Neg+2+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+2+Pl+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@%>%>naawaa%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+2+Pl+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+2+Pl+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@R.Person.3@%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+2+Pl+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.1@@R.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naawaa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>naan2y1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Dub+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Dub+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Prt+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Prt+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>n%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>n%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Dub+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+Dub+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+Prt+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Prt+3:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@+VAIO+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@D.Person.3@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@%>%>n%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+Neg+Prt+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@+VAIO+Prt+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@R.Person.3@%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+1+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@%>%>c1%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+1+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+1+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>aang #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+2:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>angw #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+2+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>egw #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+1:@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>aan%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+2+1+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>daany1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>daany1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Del+2:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>kan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Del+2+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>keg #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Imm+2:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>n #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>daa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Imm+2+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>g #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+2:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>ken2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>siidaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>sii%>%>daany1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>%>sii%>%>daany1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VAIO+Imp+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@%>kegon2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+3+4+Pcp+3+4:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>nid1%>%>y1%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Pcp+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>d1%>%>y1%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>si%>gwaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+X+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>ng%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@+VAIO+Cnj+X+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@%>%>c1%>ng%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+X+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>nd1i%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+3+4+Prt+Pcp+3+4:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>nip%>an2%>%>ii%>an #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Prt+Pcp+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode.Dub@@R.Ccnj@%>%>c1%>p%>an2%>%>ii%>ag #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+X:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>nd1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Pl+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@%>%>c1%>waag%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@%>%>c1%>waag%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>waap%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Pl:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@D.Negation@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>waad1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@+VAIO+Cnj+3+4+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@%>%>c1%>nig%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@+VAIO+Cnj+3+4+Prt+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@%>%>c1%>nig%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode.Dub@+VAIO+Cnj+3+4+Prt:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>c1%>nip%>an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode@+VAIO+Cnj+3+4:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Obv@@D.Mode@%>%>c1%>nid1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@+VAIO+Cnj+3+Dub:@D.Person@@D.Passive@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>c1%>g%>%>w4%>en2 #;
